Delaware, session 153, HB369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 82, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 8239. Office of Gun Violence Prevention and Community Safety. (a) There is hereby established, within the Department of Safety and Homeland Security, an Office of Gun Violence Prevention and Community Safety (Office). (b) The Secretary must designate a qualified individual from within the Department to serve as Director of the Office. The Director has the following duties: (1) Serve as the primary intergovernmental liaison on matters related to gun violence and community safety. (2) Facilitate coordination among state, county, and municipal governments. (3) Serve as a liaison to community based and external organizations for state, county, and municipal programs. (4) Promote interagency cooperation and responsiveness on gun violence and community safety matters. (5) Serve as the coordinator for state governmental efforts addressing gun violence and community safety. (6) Identify and report recurring gun violence issues across the State to the Secretary. (c) The Governor may designate a staff member within the Office of the Governor to support the efforts of the Office and manage community engagement and outreach. (d) The Office must advise and assist the Governor and the Secretary with respect to the following: (1) Gun violence prevention and intervention efforts. (2) The coordination of responsibilities outlined in subsection (b) of this section. (e) All State departments, agencies, interagency councils, and committees with relevance to gun violence prevention and community safety must provide full cooperation and assistance to the Office. The Office may, upon request, assist departments and agencies with related matters.